Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 20252-1509
Application; form; contents; Chief Water Officer; duties; state participation; request.

(1) Applicants for funds may file an application with the department for a grant or loan from the Water Sustainability Fund. Applications for grants to the department itself shall be filed by the department. Each application shall be filed in such manner and form and be accompanied by such information as may be prescribed by the Chief Water Officer and the commission.

(2) Any such application shall:

(a) Describe the nature and purpose of the proposed program, project, or activity;

(b) Set forth or be accompanied by a plan for development of the proposed program, project, or activity, together with engineering, economic, and financial feasibility data and information, and such estimated costs of construction or implementation as may be required by the Chief Water Officer and the commission;

(c) State whether money other than that for which the application is made will be used to help in meeting program, project, or activity costs and whether such money is available or has been sought for this purpose;

(d) When appropriate, state that the applicant holds or can acquire title to all lands or has the necessary easements and rights-of-way for the program, project, or activity and related lands and has or may acquire all water rights necessary for the proposed program, project, or activity;

(e) Show that the applicant possesses all necessary authority to undertake or participate in the proposed program, project, or activity; and

(f) Demonstrate the probable environmental and ecological consequences that may result from such proposed program, project, or activity.

(3) Upon receipt of an application, the Chief Water Officer shall evaluate and investigate all aspects of the proposed program, project, or activity and the proposed schedule for development and completion of such program, project, or activity, determine eligibility for funding, and make appropriate recommendations to the commission pursuant to sections 2-1506 to 2-1513. As a part of his or her investigation, the Chief Water Officer shall consider whether the plan for development of the program, project, or activity is satisfactory. If the Chief Water Officer determines that the plan is unsatisfactory or that the application does not contain adequate information upon which to make determinations, the Chief Water Officer shall return the application to the applicant and may make such recommendations to the applicant as are considered necessary to make the plan or the application satisfactory.

(4) Requests for utilization of the Water Sustainability Fund for state participation in any water and related land-water resources projects shall also be filed with the department for the Chief Water Officer's evaluation, investigation, and recommendations. Such requests shall be filed in the manner and form and be accompanied by such information as shall be prescribed by the department and the commission.

Laws 2014, LB1098, § 6;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 16.